sv: Typ av polermedel: Alla ändamål; Däck; Skrov; Metall; Vinyl; Övrigt
es: Tipo de pulido: Multiuso; Cubierta; Casco; Metal; Vinilo; Otros
el: Τύπος βερνικιού: Για όλες τις χρήσεις; Δάπεδο εξωτερικού χώρου; Σκάφος; Μέταλλο; Βινύλιο; Άλλο
tr: Cila Tipi: Çok amaçlı; Güverte; Gövde; Metal; Vinil; Diğer
fr: Type de vernis: Tout usage; Pont; Coque; Métal; Vinyl; Autre
pl: Typ polerki: Ogólnego zastosowania; Blat; Hull; Metal; Winyl; Inne
cs: Typ leštidla: Všechny účely; Paluba; Trup; Kov; Vinylové; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ leštidla: Viacúčelový; Paluba; Trup; Kov; Vinyl; Iné
vi: Loại đánh bóng: Đa năng; Sàn tàu; Thân tàu; Kim loại; Nhựa vinyl; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo polonês: Versátil; Área coberta; Casco; Metal; Vinil; Outro
bg-BG: Тип лак: Универсално приложение; Палуба; Корпус; Метал; Винил; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta sredstva za poliranje: Za sve namjene; Paluba; Trup; Metal; Vinil; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip produs de lustruit: Universal; Punte; Carenă; Metal; Vinil; Altele
nb: Poleringstype: Flerbruk; Dekk; Skrog; Metall; Vinyl; Annet
de: Politurtyp: Allzweck; Deck; Rumpf; Metall; Vinyl; Sonstiges
hu: Fényezés típusa: Univerzális; Fedélzet; Hajótest; Fém; Vinil; Egyéb
nl: Laktype: Universeel; Dek; Romp; Metaal; Vinyl; Andere
lt-LT: Poliravimo priemonės tipas: Universalus; Denio; Korpuso; Metalo; Vinilo; Kita
th: ประเภทน้ำยาทาเล็บ: อเนกประสงค์; สำหรับดาดฟ้าเรือ; สำหรับตัวเรือ; โลหะ; ไวนิล; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de polimento: Multiuso; Convés; Casco; Metal; Vinil; Outro
ja: 研磨タイプ: 多目的; デッキ; 船体; 金属; ビニール; その他
da: Poleringstype: Universal; Dæk; Skrog; Metal; Vinyl; Andet
fi: Kiillotustyyppi: Monikäyttöinen; Kansi; Köli; Metalli; Vinyyli; Muu
it: Tipo di lucidante: Multiuso; Ponte; Scafo; Metallo; Vinile; Altro
zh-CN: 抛光类型: 通用; 甲板; 船体; 金属; 乙烯基贴纸; 其他
ko: 광택제 유형: 다용도; 데크; 선체; 금속; 비닐; 기타
zh-TW: 拋光類型: 萬用; 甲板; 船體; 金屬; 乙烯基; 其他
en: Polish type: All-purpose; Deck; Hull; Metal; Vinyl; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta loščila: Vsestransko; Krov; Trup; Kovinski; Vinil; Drugo
ru: Тип полироля: Универсальный; Палуба; Корпус; Металл; Винил; Другое